Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.52.040

Inference of intent.

In any prosecution for burglary, any person who enters or remains unlawfully in a building may be inferred to have acted with intent to commit a crime against a person or property therein, unless such entering or remaining shall be explained by evidence satisfactory to the trier of fact to have been made without such criminal intent.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.52.040.]